Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-611
Coverage by political subdivisions; delinquent payments; penalty; collection.

Delinquent payments due under subsection (1) of section 68-610, plus one-half the amount of the delinquent payment, may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against the political subdivision liable therefor or may, at the request of the state agency, be deducted from any other money payable to such subdivision by any department or agency of the state.

Laws 1951, c. 297, § 5(4), p. 983;

Laws 1953, c. 236, § 1, p. 816.